Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) Notwithstanding ORS 352.287, the governing boards of Eastern Oregon
University, Oregon Institute of Technology,  Southern Oregon University and Western
Oregon University may establish a rate of tuition for qualifying students participating  in a
program developed by the boards for cooperation in higher education  and economic develop-
ment with countries located in East Asia as determined by the boards.
(2) The rate of tuition established under subsection (1) of this section must be equivalent
to the average tuition rate established  among Eastern Oregon University, Oregon Institute
of Technology, Southern Oregon University  and Western Oregon University for residents of
this state.
(3) In addition to the rate of  tuition established under subsection (1) of this section, the
boards may establish separate fees for services used by  qualifying students who participate
in the program developed by the boards in subsection (1) of this section.
(4) The boards shall establish the requirements for a student to  be qualified for the tui-
tion and fees established under this section.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 2649 (HB 2649-A) Page 1
Passed by House April 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 2, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2649 (HB 2649-A) Page 2